Utah statutes.
16-16-118.   Change of designated office or agent for service of process.

(1)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection 16-16-207(5), to change its designated office, its agent for service of process, or the street address or, if different, mailing address of its principal office, a limited cooperative association shall deliver to the division for filing a statement of change containing:

(a)  the name of the limited cooperative association;

(b)  the street address and, if different, mailing address of its designated office;

(c)  if the designated office is to be changed, the street address and, if different, mailing address of the new designated office;

(d)  the name of its agent for service of process; and

(e)  if the agent for service of process is to be changed, the name of the new agent.

(2)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection 16-16-207(5), to change its agent for service of process, the address of its designated office, or the street address or, if different, mailing address of its principal office, a foreign cooperative shall deliver to the division for filing a statement of change containing:

(a)  the name of the foreign cooperative;

(b)  the name, street address and, if different, mailing address of its designated office;

(c)  if the current agent for service of process or an address of the designated office is to be changed, the new information;

(d)  the street address and, if different, mailing address of its principal office; and

(e)  if the street address or, if different, the mailing address of its principal office is to be changed, the street address and, if different, the mailing address of the new principal office.

(3)  Except as otherwise provided in Section 16-16-204, a statement of change is effective when filed by the division.

